Hawaii statutes.
§467B-13 Rules. The attorney general
may make, amend, or repeal such rules pursuant to chapter 91, as may be deemed
proper to effectuate this chapter. [L 1981, c 30, §4 as superseded by c 54, §4;
am L 2004, c 93, §13]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next